Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-594
Class I, II, III, or IV school district; superintendent; appointment; salary; term.

The school board in a Class I, II, III, or IV school district may also elect at any regular meeting one superintendent of public instruction with such salary as the board deems best and may enter into contract with him or her at its discretion, for a term not to exceed three years.

Laws 1881, c. 78, § 8, p. 379;

Laws 1883, c. 72, § 20, p. 298;

Laws 1899, c. 66, § 1, p. 295;

Laws 1903, c. 93, § 1, p. 546;

R.S.1913, § 6955;

C.S.1922, § 6589;

Laws 1929, c. 94, § 3, p. 353;

C.S.1929, § 79-2508;

Laws 1937, c. 182, § 4, p. 716;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-2508;

R.S.1943, § 79-2519;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 206, p. 758;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-519;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 347;

Laws 1997, LB 345, § 28;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 54;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 63.
July 19, 2024
Class V school district, appointment of superintendent, see section 79-567.